District of Columbia statutes.
28-4033

Returned devices; subsequent sale or lease; disclosure.

An assistive technology device returned due to nonconformity under the provisions of this chapter shall not be sold or leased unless full disclosure in writing of the reason for the return is made to any prospective consumer.

History

Oct. 26, 2010, D.C. Law 18-241, § 4, 57 DCR 7550
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, §§ 83(c), 83(e), 59 DCR 6190

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction to D.C. Law 18-241 which did not affect this section as codified; and substituted “this chapter” for “this act.”